Arkansas, session 2025, HB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - HOUSE EXPENSES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable from
the Constitutional Officers Fund, for necessary expenses of the Arkansas
House of Representatives for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) SALARIES OF EMPLOYEES $311,500
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 57,000
(03) MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES 1,906,660
*JAR018*
01-15-2025 09:42:14 JAR018

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 HB1001
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,275,160

SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFERS. If the Speaker of the House and the Chief of Staff or his
designee determine that any item or portion thereof appropriated herein for a
specific purpose is not needed for such purposes, they may certify such fact
to the State Auditor, and the State Auditor shall cause transfer to be made
from one item to another between any appropriations authorized by the General
Assembly for the House of Representatives.

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. USES OF
APPROPRIATION. The funds appropriated in this Act shall be used to defray
the expenses of the House of Representatives of the Legislative Session of
the Ninety-Fourth Ninety-Fifth General Assembly, and upon adjournment of the
Legislative Session, any unexpended balance of the funds appropriated in this
Act may be used to defray the necessary expenses of the operation of the
Office of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Office of the
Chief of Staff, the Office of the Coordinator of House Legislative Services,
the Office of Parliamentarian, the Chief Clerk's Office, House Member
Services Office and other reasonable and necessary expenses of the House of
Representatives of the Ninety-Fourth Ninety-Fifth General Assembly incurred
during the interim between the adjournment of the Legislative Session of the
Ninety-Fourth Ninety-Fifth and July 1, 2024 2025.
Additionally, if it is determined by the Speaker of the House that the
presence, assistance, oversight and expertise of any House member is needed
in the interim between the legislative sessions, and if it is determined by
the Speaker of the House that certain expenses and per diem of members of the
House should be paid by the House, such expenses and per diem at the rate
authorized for attending legislative sessions shall be paid from the funds
appropriated herein for Maintenance, Operations and Expenses.

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SALARY
LEVELS. The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Chief of Staff
01-15-2025 09:42:14 JAR018

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 HB1001
or his designee shall, during the month of June, each fiscal year, meet and
determine the actual salaries to be paid each employee beginning the
following July 1. Such salaries of the employees will be based upon an
evaluation of the performance of the Chief of Staff by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives and upon an evaluation of the performance of the
other employees by the Chief of Staff or his designee.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the House of Representatives of the 95th General
Assembly convenes in Regular Session on January 13, 2025; that expenses of
the session begin immediately; and that the expenses are a just expense of
the state which must be paid at the time the services are provided.
Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and
safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its
passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the
Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time
during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the
Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date
the last house overrides the veto.



/s/House Management Committee












01-15-2025 09:42:14 JAR018